California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(iii) Whether the party exercising the peremptory challenge asked different questions of the potential juror against whom the peremptory challenge was used in contrast to questions asked of other jurors from different perceived cognizable groups about the same topic or whether the party phrased those questions differently.

(D) Whether other prospective jurors, who are not members of the same cognizable group as the challenged prospective juror, provided similar, but not necessarily identical, answers but were not the subject of a peremptory challenge by that party.

(E) Whether a reason might be
 disproportionately associated with a race, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, or religious affiliation, or perceived membership in any of those groups.

(F) Whether the reason given by the party exercising the peremptory challenge was contrary to or unsupported by the record.

(G) Whether counsel or counsel’s office, if it is a public entity, exercising the challenge has used peremptory challenges disproportionately against a given race, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, or religious affiliation, or perceived membership in any of those groups, in the present case or in past cases, including whether the counsel or counsel’s office, if it is a public entity, who made the challenge has a history of
 prior violations under Batson v. Kentucky (1986) 476 U.S. 79, People v. Wheeler (1978) 22 Cal.3d 258, Section 231.5, or this section.

(e) A peremptory challenge for any of the following reasons is presumed to be invalid unless the party exercising the peremptory challenge can show by clear and convincing evidence that an objectively reasonable person would view the rationale as unrelated to a prospective juror’s race, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, or religious affiliation, or perceived membership in any of those groups, and that the reasons articulated bear on the prospective juror’s ability to be fair and impartial in the case:

(1) Expressing a distrust of or having a negative experience with law enforcement or the criminal legal
 system.

(2) Expressing a belief that law enforcement officers engage in racial profiling or that criminal laws have been enforced in a discriminatory manner.

(3) Having a close relationship with people who have been stopped, arrested, or convicted of a crime.

(4) A prospective juror’s neighborhood.

(5) Having a child outside of marriage.

(6) Receiving state benefits.

(7) Not being a native English speaker.

(8) The ability to speak another language.

(9) Dress, attire, or personal appearance.

(10) Employment in a field that is disproportionately occupied by members listed in subdivision (a) or that serves a population disproportionately comprised of members of a group or groups listed in subdivision (a).

(11) Lack of employment or underemployment of the prospective juror or prospective juror’s family member.

(12) A prospective juror’s apparent friendliness with another prospective juror of the same group as listed in subdivision (a).

(13) Any justification that is similarly applicable to a questioned prospective juror or jurors, who are not members of
 the same cognizable group as the challenged prospective juror, but were not the subject of a peremptory challenge by that party. The unchallenged prospective juror or jurors need not share any other characteristics with the challenged prospective juror for peremptory challenge relying on this justification to be considered presumptively invalid.

(f) For purposes of subdivision (e), the term “clear and convincing” refers to the degree of certainty the factfinder must have in determining whether the reasons given for the exercise of a peremptory challenge are unrelated to the prospective juror’s cognizable group membership, bearing in mind conscious and unconscious bias. To determine that a presumption of invalidity has been overcome, the factfinder shall determine that it is highly probable that the reasons given for the exercise of a
 peremptory challenge are unrelated to conscious or unconscious bias and are instead specific to the juror and bear on that juror’s ability to be fair and impartial in the case.

(g) (1) The following reasons for peremptory challenges have historically been associated with improper discrimination in jury selection:

(A) The prospective juror was inattentive, or staring or failing to make eye contact.

(B) The prospective juror exhibited either a lack of rapport or problematic attitude, body language, or demeanor.

(C) The prospective juror provided unintelligent or confused answers.

(2) The reasons set forth in paragraph (1) are presumptively invalid unless the trial court is able to confirm that the asserted behavior occurred, based on the court’s own observations or the observations of counsel for the objecting party. Even with that confirmation, the counsel offering the reason shall explain why the asserted demeanor, behavior, or manner in which the prospective juror answered questions matters to the case to be tried.

(h) Upon a court granting an objection to the improper exercise of a peremptory challenge, the court shall do one or more of the following:

(1) Quash the jury venire and start jury selection anew. This remedy shall be provided if requested by the objecting party.

(2) If the motion is granted after the jury has been impaneled, declare a mistrial and select a new jury if requested by the defendant.

(3) Seat the challenged juror.

(4) Provide the objecting party additional challenges.

(5) Provide another remedy as the court deems appropriate.

(i) This section applies in all jury trials in which jury selection begins on or after January 1, 2022.

(j) The denial of an objection made under this section shall be reviewed by the appellate court de novo, with the trial court’s express factual findings reviewed for substantial evidence. The appellate court
 shall not impute to the trial court any findings, including findings of a prospective juror’s demeanor, that the trial court did not expressly state on the record. The reviewing court shall consider only reasons actually given under subdivision (c) and shall not speculate as to or consider reasons that were not given to explain either the party’s use of the peremptory challenge or the party’s failure to challenge similarly situated jurors who are not members of the same cognizable group as the challenged juror, regardless of whether the moving party made a comparative analysis argument in the trial court. Should the appellate court determine that the objection was erroneously denied, that error shall be deemed prejudicial, the judgment shall be reversed, and the case remanded for a new trial.

(k) (1) Except as specified
 in paragraph (2), this section shall not apply to civil cases.

(2) This section shall apply in the following civil cases:

(A) Civil cases involving a civil rights violation, including the following:

(i) Actions alleging a violation against a protected class enumerated in subdivision (a).

(ii) Actions alleging a violation of the Tom Bane Civil Rights Act (Section 52.1 of the Civil Code) or the Unruh Civil Rights Act (Section 51 of the Civil Code).

(iii) Actions alleging a violation pursuant to Section 1983 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(iv) Actions alleging a violation of Title VI of the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 2000d, et seq.), the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.), or the federal Fair Housing Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.).

(v) Actions alleging a violation of the California Fair Employment and Housing Act (Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), including, but not limited to, actions alleging discrimination, harassment, or retaliation.

(B) Actions for the civil commitment of a person, including a person who is determined to be a sexually violent predator pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 6600) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(C) Civil cases for damages arising from a hate crime.

(l) For civil cases governed under paragraph (2) of subdivision (k),
 the party bringing the claim described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (k) shall notify the court and the other party or parties, after the final status conference, or, if no final status conference is held, at least 15 calendar days before the date of the trial, that the procedures under this section apply.

(m) It is the intent of the Legislature that enactment of this section shall not, in purpose or effect, lower the standard for judging challenges for cause or expand use of challenges for cause.

(n) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 318, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 656, Sec. 1.   (SB 645)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

232.

(a) Prior to the examination of prospective trial jurors in the panel assigned for voir dire, the following perjury acknowledgment and agreement shall be obtained from the panel, which shall be acknowledged by the prospective jurors with the statement “I do”:

“Do you understand and agree, under penalty of perjury, that you will accurately and truthfully
 answer all questions about your qualifications and ability to serve as a juror in this case, and that failure to do so may result in criminal prosecution?”

(b) As soon as the selection of the trial jury is completed, the following acknowledgment and agreement shall be obtained from the trial jurors, which shall be acknowledged by the statement “I do”:

“Do you understand and agree that you will carefully consider the case being heard in this court, and
 that you will reach a verdict based only on the evidence presented to you and the instructions on the law given by the court?”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 29, Sec. 1.   (AB 223)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

233.

If, before the jury has returned its verdict to the court, a juror becomes sick or, upon other good cause shown to the court, is found to be unable to perform his or her duty, the court may order the juror to be discharged. If any alternate jurors have been selected as provided by law, one of them shall then be designated by the court to take the place of the juror so discharged. If after all alternate jurors have been made regular jurors or if there is no alternate juror, a juror becomes sick or otherwise unable to perform the juror’s duty and has been discharged by the court as provided in this section, the jury shall be discharged and a new jury then or
 afterwards impaneled, and the cause may again be tried. Alternatively, with the consent of all parties, the trial may proceed with only the remaining jurors, or another juror may be sworn and the trial begin anew.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1245, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

234.

Whenever, in the opinion of a judge of a superior court about to try a civil or criminal action or proceeding, the trial is likely to be a protracted one, or upon stipulation of the parties, the court may cause an entry to that effect to be made in the minutes of the court and thereupon, immediately after the jury is impaneled and sworn, the court may direct the calling of one or more additional jurors, in its discretion, to
 be known as “alternate jurors.”

These alternate jurors shall be drawn from the same source, and in the same manner, and have the same qualifications, as the jurors already sworn, and shall be subject to the same examination and challenges. However, each side, or each defendant, as provided in Section 231, shall be entitled to as many peremptory challenges to the alternate jurors as there are alternate jurors called.

The alternate jurors shall be seated so as to have equal power and facilities for seeing and hearing the proceedings in the case, and shall take the same oath as the jurors already selected, and shall, unless excused by the court, attend at all times upon the trial of the cause in company with the other jurors, but shall not participate in deliberation unless ordered by the court, and for a failure to do so are liable to be punished for contempt.

They shall obey the
 orders of and be bound by the admonition of the court, upon each adjournment of the court; but if the regular jurors are ordered to be kept in the custody of the sheriff or marshal during the trial of the cause, the alternate jurors shall also be kept in confinement with the other jurors; and upon final submission of the case to the jury, the alternate jurors shall be kept in the custody of the sheriff or marshal who shall not suffer any communication to be made to them except by order of the court, and shall not be discharged until the original jurors are discharged, except as provided in this section.

If at any time, whether before or after the final submission of the case to the jury, a juror dies or becomes ill, or upon other good cause shown to the court is found to be unable to perform his or her duty, or if a juror requests a discharge and good cause appears therefor, the court may order the juror to be discharged and draw the name of an alternate, who shall
 then take his or her place in the jury box, and be subject to the same rules and regulations as though he or she had been selected as one of the original jurors.

All laws relative to fees, expenses, and mileage or transportation of jurors shall be applicable to alternate jurors, except that in civil cases the sums for fees and mileage or transportation need not be deposited until the judge directs alternate jurors to be impaneled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 33.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

235.

At the request of the sheriff, coroner, or other ministerial officer, the jury commissioner shall provide such prospective jurors as may be required to form a jury of inquest. Prospective jurors so provided shall be selected, obligated, and compensated in the same manner as other jurors selected under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1245, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

236.

When six or more prospective jurors of inquest attend, they shall be sworn by the coroner to inquire who the person was, and when, where, and by what means the person came to his or her death, to inquire into the circumstances attending the death, and to render a true verdict thereon, according to the evidence offered them or arising from the inspection of the body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1245, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

237.

(a) (1) The names of qualified jurors drawn from the qualified juror list for the superior court shall be made available to the public upon request unless the court determines that a compelling interest, as defined in subdivision (b), requires that this information should be kept confidential or its use limited in whole or in part.

(2) Upon the recording of a jury’s verdict in a criminal jury proceeding, the court’s record of personal juror identifying
 information of trial jurors, as defined in Section 194, consisting of names, addresses, and telephone numbers, shall be sealed until further order of the court as provided by this section.

(3) For purposes of this section, “sealed” or “sealing” means extracting or otherwise removing the personal juror identifying information from the court record.

(4) This subdivision applies only to cases in which a jury verdict was returned on or after January 1, 1996.

(b) Any person may petition the court for access to these records. The petition shall be supported by a declaration that includes facts sufficient to establish good cause for the release of the juror’s personal identifying information. The court shall set the matter for hearing if the petition and supporting declaration establish a prima facie showing of good cause
 for the release of the personal juror identifying information, but shall not set the matter for hearing if there is a showing on the record of facts that establish a compelling interest against disclosure. A compelling interest includes, but is not limited to, protecting jurors from threats or danger of physical harm. If the court does not set the matter for hearing, the court shall by minute order set forth the reasons and make express findings either of a lack of a prima facie showing of good cause or the presence of a compelling interest against disclosure.

(c) If a hearing is set pursuant to subdivision (b), the petitioner shall provide notice of the petition and the time and place of the hearing at least 20 days prior to the date of the hearing to the parties in the criminal action. The court shall provide notice to each affected former juror by personal service or by first-class mail, addressed to the last known address of the former
 juror as shown in the records of the court. In a capital case, the petitioner shall also serve notice on the Attorney General. Any affected former juror may appear in person, in writing, by telephone, or by counsel to protest the granting of the petition. A former juror who wishes to appear at the hearing to oppose the unsealing of the personal juror identifying information may request the court to close the hearing in order to protect the former juror’s anonymity.

(d) After the hearing, the records shall be made available as requested in the petition, unless a former juror’s protest to the granting of the petition is sustained. The court shall sustain the protest of the former juror if, in the discretion of the court, the petitioner fails to show good cause, the record establishes the presence of a compelling interest against disclosure as defined in subdivision (b), or the juror is unwilling to be contacted by the petitioner. The court shall
 set forth reasons and make express findings to support the granting or denying of the petition to disclose. The court may require the person to whom disclosure is made, or his or her agent or employee, to agree not to divulge jurors’ identities or identifying information to others; the court may otherwise limit disclosure in any manner it deems appropriate.

(e) Any court employee who has legal access to personal juror identifying information sealed under subdivision (a), who discloses the information, knowing it to be a violation of this section or a court order issued under this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(f) Any person who intentionally solicits another to unlawfully access or disclose personal juror identifying information contained in records sealed under subdivision (a), knowing that the records have been sealed, or who, knowing that the information was unlawfully
 secured, intentionally discloses it to another person is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 636, Sec. 2.   Effective September 19, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

242.

(a) Following the receipt of a verdict and before discharging the jury in a criminal action or proceeding alleging a violent felony, the court shall provide written information to the trial jurors about mental health awareness, including information about stress relief and symptoms that may be experienced following exposure to trauma.

(b) Following the receipt of a verdict in a criminal action or proceeding alleging a violent felony, the court shall distribute, in a manner determined by the court,
 information to the alternate jurors who have been discharged from their duty about mental health awareness, including information about stress relief and symptoms that may be experienced following exposure to trauma.

(c) At the conclusion of a criminal action or proceeding alleging a violent felony in which evidence was presented, but a verdict was not rendered by the jury, the court shall provide written information about mental health awareness, including information about stress relief and symptoms that may be experienced following exposure to trauma, before discharging the jury and alternate jurors. The information shall only be provided after the jurors and alternate jurors are no longer responsible for rendering a verdict in the trial.

(d) The court may share
 this information with jurors and alternate jurors following the conclusion of a criminal action or proceeding alleging an offense that is not a violent felony.

(e) The Judicial Council shall develop the written educational information that the court shall print and distribute pursuant to this section. The information shall include, but shall not be limited to, the signs and symptoms of distress, healthy coping mechanisms, and how to seek help for exposure to trauma if needed.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “violent felony” has the same definition as in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 204, Sec. 1.   (AB 2985)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Court Commissioners [259. - 259.]

259.

Subject to the supervision of the court, every court commissioner shall have power to do all of the following:

(a) Hear and determine ex parte motions for orders and alternative writs and writs of habeas corpus in the superior court for which the court commissioner is appointed.

(b) Take proof and make and report findings thereon as to any matter of fact upon which information is required by the court. Any party to any contested
 proceeding may except to the report and the subsequent order of the court made thereon within five days after written notice of the court’s action. A copy of the exceptions shall be filed and served upon opposing party or counsel within the five days. The party may argue any exceptions before the court on giving notice of motion for that purpose within 10 days from entry thereof. After a hearing before the court on the exceptions, the court may sustain, or set aside, or modify its order.

(c) Take and approve any bonds and undertakings in actions or proceedings, and determine objections to the bonds and undertakings.

(d) Act as temporary judge when otherwise qualified so to act and when appointed for that purpose, on stipulation of the parties litigant. While acting as temporary judge the commissioner shall receive no compensation therefor other than compensation as
 commissioner.

(e) Hear and report findings and conclusions to the court for approval, rejection, or change, all preliminary matters including motions or petitions for the custody and support of children, the allowance of temporary spousal support, costs and attorneys’ fees, and issues of fact in contempt proceedings in proceedings for support, dissolution of marriage, nullity of marriage, or legal separation.

(f) Hear actions to establish paternity and to establish or enforce child and spousal support pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4251 of the Family Code.

(g) Hear, report on, and determine all uncontested actions and proceedings subject to the requirements of subdivision (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 4. MINISTERIAL OFFICERS OF COURTS OF JUSTICE [262. - 274a.]



  CHAPTER 1. Of Ministerial Officers Generally [262. - 262.11.]

262.

The direction or authority of a party or his or her attorney to a sheriff, in respect to the execution of process or return thereof, or to any related act or omission, is not available to discharge or excuse the sheriff from a liability for neglect or misconduct, unless it is contained in written instructions by the attorney of the party, including the signature and name of the attorney of the party, or by the party, if he or
 she has no attorney. Subject to subdivision (c) of Section 263, the instructions may be transmitted electronically pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 263).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.   (AB 2394)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

262.1.

A sheriff or other ministerial officer is justified in the execution of, and shall execute, all process and orders regular on their face and issued by competent authority, whatever may be the defect in the proceedings upon which they were issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

262.2.

Except as otherwise provided, the officer executing process shall, so long as he or she retains the original process, show it to any interested person, upon request. The officer shall show the process, with all papers, or electronic copies of all papers, attached, at his or her office whenever the office is open for business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 680, Sec. 2.   (AB 2394)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

262.3.

When any process remains with the sheriff unexecuted, in whole or in part, at the time of his death, resignation of office, or at the expiration of his term of office, such process shall be executed by his successor or successors in office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

262.4.

If the sheriff sells real estate, under and by virtue of an execution or order of court, the sheriff, or his or her successors in office, shall execute and deliver to the purchaser or purchasers all deeds and conveyances required by law and necessary for the purpose, and those deeds and conveyances shall be valid in law as if they had been executed by the sheriff who made the sale. The deeds and conveyances may be recorded
 electronically pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 263) if they comply with the Electronic Recording Delivery Act of 2004 (Article 6 (commencing with Section 27390) of Chapter 6 of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 680, Sec. 3.   (AB 2394)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

262.5.

Service of a paper, other than process, upon the sheriff may be made by delivering it to him or to one of his deputies, or to a person in charge of the office during office hours, or, if no such person is there, by leaving it in a conspicuous place in the office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

262.6.

When the sheriff is a party to an action or proceeding, the process and orders therein, which it would otherwise be the duty of the sheriff to execute, shall be executed by the coroner of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

262.7.

If an action is begun against a sheriff, all process and orders may be served by any person in the manner provided in this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 470, Sec. 1.   (AB 2256)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

262.8.

Process or orders in an action or proceeding may be executed by a person residing in the county, designated by the court, or the judge thereof, and denominated an elisor, in the following cases:

(a) When the sheriff and coroner are both parties.

(b) When either of these officers is a party, and the process is against the other.

(c) When either of these officers is a party, and there is a vacancy in the office of the other, or where it appears, by affidavit, to the satisfaction of
 the court in which the proceeding is pending, or the judge thereof, that both of these officers are disqualified, or by reason of any bias, prejudice, or other cause would not act promptly or impartially.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

262.9.

When process is delivered to an elisor, he shall execute and return it in the same manner as the sheriff is required to execute similar process.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

262.10.

Whenever process is executed, or any act performed by a coroner or elisor, he shall receive a reasonable compensation, to be fixed by the court, to be paid by the plaintiff in case of the summoning of jurors to complete the panel, and by the person or party requiring the service in all other cases in private action. If rendered at the instance of the people, it shall be audited and paid as a county charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

262.11.

In all cases where new counties have been or may hereafter be created, and executions, orders of sale upon foreclosures of mortgages, or other process affecting specific real estate have been or may hereafter be adjudged by the final judgment or decree of a court of competent jurisdiction, to be executed by the sheriff of the county in which such real estate was originally situated, such process may be executed by the sheriff of the new county in which such real estate is found to be situated, with the like effect as if he were the sheriff of the county designated in the judgment, decree, or order of sale to execute the same.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Levying Officer Electronic Transactions Act [263. - 263.7.]

263.

(a) This chapter may be cited as the Levying Officer Electronic Transactions Act.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that modern technologies offer alternatives to paper-based systems and provide the means to create, store, retrieve, and transmit records and documents in electronic form resulting in increased efficiency, taxpayer savings, and improved public access to levying officers. It is the
 intent of the Legislature in enacting this act to accommodate current and future technologies based on industry standards.

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a court or levying officer to comply with any of its provisions unless the court and the levying officer have (1) jointly determined that both the court and the sheriff’s department have the resources and the technological capacity to do so, and (2) have mutually agreed to electronically act upon documents as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 680, Sec. 4.   (AB 2394)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

263.1.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following definitions:

(a) “Electronic mail” or “e-mail” means an electronic message that is sent to an e-mail address and transmitted between two or more telecommunications devices, computers, or electronic devices capable of receiving electronic messages through a local, regional, or global computer network, whether or not the message is converted to hard copy format
 after receipt, viewed upon transmission, or stored for later retrieval.

(b) “Electronic record” means a document or record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means.

(c) “Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to, or logically associated with, an electronic record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the electronic record.

(d) “Fax” is an abbreviation for “facsimile” and refers, as indicated by the context, to a facsimile transmission or to a document so transmitted.

(e) “Fax machine” means a machine that can send and receive a facsimile transmission using industry standards and includes a fax modem connected to a computer.

(f) “Fax transmission” means the electronic transmission and reconstruction of a document that prints a duplicate of the original document at the receiving end. “Fax transmission” includes, but is not limited to, the use of a facsimile machine or the process of integrating an electronic fax software application to automate the sending and receiving of a faxed document as an electronic record, in portable data format, by e-mail or similar electronic means.

(g) “Information processing system” means an electronic system for creating, generating, sending, receiving, storing, displaying, retrieving, or processing information, but does not include a fax machine.

(h) “Instructions” and “levying officer instructions” mean a written request to a levying officer to serve process, perform a levy, execute an arrest warrant, or
 perform some other act.

(i) “Legal entity” means the legal form of an artificial person and includes a corporation, defunct corporation, unincorporated association, partnership, public agency, limited liability company, joint stock company or association, and limited liability partnership.

(j) “Levying officer” means the sheriff or marshal acting as a ministerial officer pursuant to Section 26608 of the Government Code.

(k) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium, or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(l) “Transmission record” means the electronic record or document printed by the sending fax machine, stating the telephone number of the receiving fax machine, the number of
 pages sent, the transmission time and date, and an indication of any errors in transmission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 680, Sec. 4.   (AB 2394)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

263.2.

(a) A levying officer may utilize an information processing system to create, generate, send, receive, store, display, retrieve, or process information, electronic records, and documents when based on industry standards and only to the extent that the levying officer has the resources and technological capacity to do so.

(b) If a technical problem with the levying officer’s system prevents the levying
 officer from receiving an electronic transmission during regular business hours on a particular court day, and the electronic sender demonstrates an attempt to electronically transmit the document on that day, the levying officer shall deem the document or record as filed on that day.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 680, Sec. 4.   (AB 2394)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

263.3.

Whenever the fax transmission of a document or record to a levying officer is authorized pursuant to this chapter, all of the following shall apply:

(a) A levying officer may act upon an electronic record or document transmitted by a facsimile machine in the same manner as the paper record or document upon which the electronic record or document is based.

(b) A facsimile cover sheet shall accompany the faxed record or document and include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the sender.

(2) The fax number of the sender.

(3) The name of the levying officer.

(4) The fax number of the levying officer.

(5) A description of the record or document, including its name, if any, and the number of pages.

(6) A statement directing the recipient of the faxed document or record to fax to the sender a confirmation, if true, that the fax was properly received.

(c) A person authorized to fax a record or
 document to the levying officer pursuant to this chapter shall do all of the following:

(1) Retain the paper version of the record or document.

(2) Print or otherwise retain a transmission record of the fax transmission.

(3) Deliver the paper version of the record, document, or transmission record to the levying officer within five days after a request to do so has been mailed to the sender by the levying officer.

(d) The levying officer shall retain the facsimile cover sheet together with the faxed record or document.

(e) The levying officer may electronically copy and store the printed cover sheet, record, or document as an electronic record.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 680, Sec. 4.   (AB 2394)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

263.4.

(a) A levying officer may create, store, print, or transmit an electronic record in the place of, and in the same manner as, the paper record or document upon which the electronic record is based.

(b) An electronic record transmitted to a levying officer shall be accompanied by all of the following information:

(1) The name of the
 sender.

(2) The electronic address of the sender.

(3) The name of the levying officer.

(4) The electronic address or fax number of the levying officer.

(c) The person transmitting the electronic record shall do both of the following:

(1) Retain the paper version of the record or document.

(2) Deliver the paper version of the record or document to the levying officer within five days after a request to do so has been mailed to the sender by the levying officer.

(d) For the purpose of this section, “transmission” of an electronic record includes sending the
 electronic record included in, or in conjunction with, an electronic mail message, as defined in Section 263.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 680, Sec. 4.   (AB 2394)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

263.6.

(a) In lieu of returning to court the paper version of an original writ of execution, the levying officer may retain the original writ or an electronic copy of the original writ and file only a return of the levying officer’s actions.

(b) If the original writ is not returned to court as provided in subdivision (a), the levying officer shall retain, for not less than two years after the levying
 officer’s return is filed with court, each of the following, as applicable:

(1) The original paper writ or digital image of the writ.

(2) The memorandum of garnishee.

(3) The employer’s return.

(4) An inventory of the levied property.

(c) A creditor seeking the issuance of a writ directed to another county may direct the levying officer to file an accounting of the levying officer’s actions with the court.

(1) The filing of the accounting described in this subdivision does not constitute a return of the writ.

(2) The accounting shall indicate that the levying
 officer is in possession of an active writ.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 680, Sec. 4.   (AB 2394)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

263.7.

(a) A levying officer shall exclude or redact the following identifiers from any record or document made available to the public:

(1) Social security number.

(2) Financial account number.

(b) If an identifier is redacted, only the last four digits of the number may be
 used.

(c) A levying officer also shall exclude or redact the identifiers listed in subdivision (a) from any writ return filed with the court.

(d) The term “public” does not include the creditor, debtor, garnishee, or third-party claimant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 680, Sec. 4.   (AB 2394)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Phonographic Reporters [269. - 274a.]

269.

(a) An official reporter or official reporter pro tempore of the superior court shall take down in shorthand all testimony, objections made, rulings of the court, exceptions taken, arraignments, pleas, sentences, arguments of the attorneys to the jury, and statements and remarks made and oral instructions given by the judge or other judicial officer, in the following cases:

(1) In a civil case, on the order of the court or at the request of a party.
